apertium-krl.krl.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_AI/TO

0:to ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
0:to ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON ADJ_UU/ŠI

0:ši  ADJ_SGNOM_0 ;
0:vve ADJ_CASES_SG_BACK ;


LEXICON PROPN_PETROSKOI

0 PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 PROPN_CASES_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_JYŠKYJÄRV/I

0:i PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e PROPN_CASES_FRONT ;

LEXICON PROPN_KARJALA

0 PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 PROPN_CASES_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_MORDOUVI/A

0:a PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e PROPN_CASES_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_TORVI/NEN

0:nen PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PROPN_CASES_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_LUMIKELLO

0 PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 PROPN_CASES_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_KONSTANTIN

0 PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i PROPN_CASES_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_MI/NÄ

0:nä  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:nu  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PRON_MI/E

0:e PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:u PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:lma  # ;

LEXICON PRON_M/YÖ

0:yö PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e PRON_CASES_PL ;

LEXICON PRON_TÄ/MÄ

0:mä PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PRON_NÄ/MÄ

0:mä PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_CASES_PL ;

LEXICON PRON_T/UO

0:uo  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:uo  PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_N/UO

0:uo  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:oi  PRON_CASES_PL ;

LEXICON PRON_Š/E

0:e  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
%<sg%>%<geb%>:en # ;
%<sg%>%<ine%>:iinä # ;

LEXICON PRON_N/E

0:e  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i  PRON_CASES_PL ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:iijen # ;

LEXICON PRON_IČ/E

0:e  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:či PRON_SGPAR_E ;

LEXICON PRON_KAI/KKI

0 PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:kki PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ke  PRON_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_KU/DAI

0:dai PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:dua PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_KUMPA/INE

0:ine PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_KE/N

0:n PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ne PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PRON_MI

0  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0 PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT_S ;

LEXICON PRON_KU

0 PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_JOKA

0  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;

LEXICON NOUN_KYNNY/Š

0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:kše NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:š NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:ks   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_SUALE/Š

0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:he NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:š NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:h   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_RAHVA/Š

0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ha NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:š NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:h   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_MIE/Š

0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:he NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:š NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:h   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠOIT/IN

0:in NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:time NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:in  NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:tim   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:tim   NOUN_PLGEN_IEN ;
0:tim   NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_JÄŠEN

0 NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0 NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_ISTORI/E

0:e NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:ju NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:jo NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_PEL/I

0:i NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:i  NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:e  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:i  NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;

LEXICON NOUN_TUN/TI

0:ti NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ni NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:ti  NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:ne  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:te  NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;

LEXICON NOUN_LAPŠ/I

0:i NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:i  NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:i  NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;

LEXICON NOUN_PIIR/I

0:i NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:i NOUN_SGPAR_Ä ;

LEXICON NOUN_KIEL/I

0:i NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_SGPAR_DY ;

LEXICON NOUN_PROJEKT/U

0:u NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_RUA/DO

0:to NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:do NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:du NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:to NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:do NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_NUMERO

0 NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0 NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0 NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_KYYK/KÄ

0:kä NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ä NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:k  NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_PAIK/KA

0:ka NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:o NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:ko NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:ko NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;

LEXICON NOUN_TA/PA

0:pa NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:va NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:vo NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK_WEAK ;
0:po NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK_STRONG ;
0:po NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;

LEXICON NOUN_MUSIIK/KI

0:ki NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠOIT/TU

0:tu NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:tu NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:u NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_JOUK/KO

0:ko NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ku  NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:o NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_AL/KU

0:ku NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:u NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠU/KU

0:ku NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ku NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;
0:vu NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;


LEXICON NOUN_KO/TI

0:ti NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i  NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:dilo  NOUN_CASES_LO/I_PL ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠIJAHI/NI

0:ni NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s  NOUN_SGPAR_TU ;
0:s  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_ELAVUTTAMI/NE

0:ne NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s  NOUN_SGPAR_TU ;
0:s  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_JÄRJEŠTÄJ/Ä

0:ä  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ä  NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0    NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0    NOUN_PLPAR_IE  ;

LEXICON NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A

0:a  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0    NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0    NOUN_PLPAR_IE  ;

LEXICON NOUN_PAKIN/A

0:a  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:u  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:o    NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_KAL/A

0:a  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:u  NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:u  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠKOL/A

0:a  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0    NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_PEŠ/Ä

0:ä  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ä  NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_KENT/TÄ

0:tä  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ä  NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:t   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_EMÄN/TÄ

0:tä  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:nä  NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:t   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠIÄN/TÖ

0:tö  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:nö  NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:nö  NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_MU/A

0:a NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_PERIN/NEH

0:neh   NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:tee NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:teh   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:teh   NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_PEREH

0   NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_MUR/RE

0:re  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:tehe  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:teh  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_VU/OSI

0:osi  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:uvve NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_T/YÖ

0:yö   NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:yö   NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:ö    NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_Y/KSI

0:ksi NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:hte NUM_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT ;
0:he NUM_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KA/KŠI

0:kši NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:hte NUM_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:he NUM_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLM/E

0:e NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_NEL/LÄ

0:l’ä  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:l’ä  NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_VII/SI

0:zi  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:jje NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KUU/ŠI

0:zi  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:vve NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_SEIČČE/MEN

0:men NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:me  NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KAHEKŠA/N

0:n  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0    NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_YHEKŠÄ/N

0:n  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0    NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KYMMENE/N

0:n  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0   NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_MILJONA

0 NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0 NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_ENŠIMMÄI/NI

0:ni NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_TOI/NI

0:ni NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLMA/Š

0:š  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:nne NUM_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_NELLÄ/Š

0:š  NUM_SGNOM_0 ;
0:nne NUM_CASES_SG_FRONT ;



LEXICON PUNCT_PISTE

0   # ;

LEXICON SYM_.

0 # ;

!! Morphs
LEXICON AUX_PCP

!! FIXME
%<pp%>:t # ;
%<pp%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:n # ;

LEXICON AUX_3SG_0

%<act%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON AUX_CONNEG_0

%<conneg%>%<sg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON AUX_PRES_WEAK

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:n # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:t # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:mmä # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ttä # ;

LEXICON AUX_PAST_SG3_0

%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON AUX_PASSIVE_H

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:h # ;
%<pasv%>:h # ;

LEXICON VERB_PAST_3SG_0

%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON NOUN
ainehisto%<n%>:ainehisto NOUN_NUMERO ;
alku%<n%>:al  NOUN_AL/KU ;
artteli%<n%>:arttel NOUN_PIIR/I ;
elavuttamine%<n%>:elavuttami NOUN_ELAVUTTAMI/NE ;
emäntä%<n%>:emän NOUN_EMÄN/TÄ ;
esityš#numero%<n%>:esityš0numero NOUN_NUMERO ;
etno#tjuttora%<n%>:etno0tjuttor NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
etno#tjuttora%<n%>:etno0tjuttor NOUN_ŠKOL/A ;
henkilö#kilpailu%<n%>:henkilö0kilpailu NOUN_NUMERO ;
hävijä%<n%>:hävij NOUN_JÄRJEŠTÄJ/Ä ;
ilma#piiri%<n%>:ilma0piir NOUN_PIIR/I ;
istorie%<n%>:istori  NOUN_ISTORI/E ;
isäntä%<n%>:isän NOUN_EMÄN/TÄ ;
johtaja%<n%>:johtaj NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
joukko%<n%>:jouk NOUN_JOUK/KO ;
juuri%<n%>:juur NOUN_LAPŠ/I ;
järještäjä%<n%>:järještäj NOUN_JÄRJEŠTÄJ/Ä ;
jäšen%<n%>:jäsen NOUN_JÄŠEN ;
kaččoja%<n%>:kaččoj NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
kala%<n%>:kal NOUN_KAL/A ;
kalaonni%<n%>:kalaonn NOUN_LAPŠ/I ;
kalaštaja%<n%>:kalaštaj NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
karjalaine%<n%>:karjalai NOUN_ELAVUTTAMI/NE ;
karjala%<n%>:karjal NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
kenttä%<n%>:kent NOUN_KENT/TÄ ;
kerho%<n%>:kerho NOUN_NUMERO ;
kešä%<n%>:keš NOUN_PEŠ/Ä ;
kieli%<n%>:kiel NOUN_KIEL/I ;
kieli#pešä%<n%>:kieli0peš NOUN_PEŠ/Ä ;
kilpailu%<n%>:kilpailu NOUN_NUMERO ;
kirjonta#motiivi%<n%>:kirjonta0motiiv NOUN_LAPŠ/I ;
kirjuttaja%<n%>:kirjuttaj NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
koti%<n%>:ko NOUN_KO/TI ;
kulttuuri%<n%>:kulttuur NOUN_KIEL/I ;
kulttuuri#talo%<n%>:kulttuuri0talo NOUN_NUMERO ;
kylä%<n%>:kyl NOUN_PEŠ/Ä ;
kynnyš%<n%>:kynny  NOUN_KYNNY/Š ;
kyykkä%<n%>:kyyk  NOUN_KYYK/KÄ ;
kyykkäri#polvi%<n%>:kyykkäri0polv NOUN_LAPŠ/I ;
käsi#paikka%<n%>:käsi0paik NOUN_PAIK/KA ;
käsi#työ%<n%>:käsi0t NOUN_T/YÖ ;
lahja%<n%>:lahj NOUN_ŠKOL/A ;
lapsien#kazvattaja%<n%>:lapsien0kazvattaj NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
lapši%<n%>:lapš NOUN_LAPŠ/I ;
laulu%<n%>:laulu NOUN_NUMERO ;
lava%<n%>:lav NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
livvin#karjala%<n%>:livvin0karjal NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
malli%<n%>:mall NOUN_PIIR/I ;
mieš%<n%>:mie  NOUN_MIE/Š ;
mua%<n%>:mu NOUN_MU/A ;
murre%<n%>:mur  NOUN_MUR/RE ;
musiikki%<n%>:musiik  NOUN_MUSIIK/KI ;
musiikki#šoitin%<n%>:musiikki0šoit NOUN_ŠOIT/IN ;
naine%<n%>:nai NOUN_ELAVUTTAMI/NE ;
naine%<n%>:nai NOUN_ELAVUTTAMI/NE ;
nero%<n%>:nero NOUN_NUMERO ;
niekka%<n%>:niek NOUN_PAIK/KA ;
niemi#mua%<n%>:niemi0mu NOUN_MU/A ;
nimi%<n%>:nim NOUN_KIEL/I ;
numero%<n%>:numero NOUN_NUMERO ;
opastus#ala%<n%>:opastus#al NOUN_ŠKOL/A ;
ošallistuja%<n%>:ošallistuj NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
oša%<n%>:oš NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
pakina%<n%>:pakin NOUN_PAKIN/A ;
peli%<n%>:pel NOUN_PEL/I ;
peluaja%<n%>:peluaj  NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
pereh%<n%>:pereh NOUN_PEREH ;
perinneh%<n%>:perin NOUN_PERIN/NEH ;
piiri%<n%>:piir NOUN_PIIR/I ;
pisteh%<n%>:pisteh NOUN_PEREH ;
pohjone%<n%>:pohjo NOUN_ELAVUTTAMI/NE ;
polvi%<n%>:polv NOUN_LAPŠ/I ;
projekta%<n%>:projekt NOUN_ŠKOL/A ;
projektu%<n%>:projekt NOUN_PROJEKT/U ;
pruas#niekka%<n%>:pruas0niek NOUN_PAIK/KA ;
päivy#koti%<n%>:päivy0ko NOUN_KO/TI ;
rahvaš%<n%>:rahva NOUN_RAHVA/Š ;
ruado%<n%>:rua NOUN_RUA/DO ;
šattuma%<n%>:šattum NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
šijahini%<n%>:šijahi NOUN_ŠIJAHI/NI ;
šiäntö%<n%>:šiän NOUN_ŠIÄN/TÖ ;
škola%<n%>:škol NOUN_ŠKOL/A ;
škola%<n%>:škol NOUN_ŠKOL/A ;
šoitin%<n%>:šoit NOUN_ŠOIT/IN ;
šoittu%<n%>:šoit  NOUN_ŠOIT/TU ;
sualeš%<n%>:suale NOUN_SUALE/Š ;
šuku%<n%>:šu NOUN_ŠU/KU ;
talo%<n%>:talo NOUN_NUMERO ;
tapa%<n%>:ta  NOUN_TA/PA ;
tehtävä%<n%>:tehtäv NOUN_PEŠ/Ä ;
tietäjä%<n%>:tietäj NOUN_JÄRJEŠTÄJ/Ä ;
tila%<n%>:til NOUN_ŠKOL/A ;
tuuvvittamini%<n%>:tuuvvittami NOUN_ŠIJAHI/NI ;
tunti%<n%>:tun NOUN_TUN/TI ;
työ%<n%>:t NOUN_T/YÖ ;
vetäjä%<n%>:vetäj NOUN_JÄRJEŠTÄJ/Ä ;
voittaja%<n%>:voittaj NOUN_KAZVATTAJ/A ;
vuosi%<n%>:vu  NOUN_VU/OSI ;
vähembistö#kieli%<n%>:vähembistö0kiel NOUN_KIEL/I ;
